District of Columbia statutes.
10-1903

Approval of plans.

The Council approves the Homeless Submission, the Walter Reed Reuse Plan, the Walter Reed LRA Committee final recommendations, adopted by the Walter Reed LRA, and the Legally Binding Agreements, as transmitted by the Mayor, for submission to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, and, thereafter, the U.S. Department of Defense. Further, the Mayor may amend or supplement the Walter Reed Reuse Plan, Homeless Submission, and Legally Binding Agreements based upon comments from the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development; provided, that any proposed amendment or supplement shall be made available by the Mayor to the public for a 30-day period of public review and comment.

Oct. 16, 2012, D.C. Law 19-175, § 4, 59 DCR 9106
For temporary addition of section, see § 4 of the Walter Reed Army Medical Center Base Realignment and Closure Homeless Assistance Submission Congressional Review Emergency Approval Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-528, November 2, 2012, 59 DCR 13325), applicable as of October 16, 2012.